District of Columbia statutes.
5-541.01

Salary schedule; maximum compensation permitted.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (a-1) and (b) of this section, the annual rates of basic compensation of the officers and members of the Metropolitan Police force and the Fire Department of the District of Columbia shall be fixed in accordance with the following schedule of rates:

Class 1: Fire private, police private
$12,296
$12,667
$13,282
$13,897
$14,877
$15,863
$16,478
$17,093
$17,707

Class 2: Fire inspector
14,019
14,877
15,741
16,600
17,458
18,322
19,181

Class 3: Detective, assistant pilot, assistant marine engineer
15,370
16,139
16,907
17,676
18,444
19,213
19,981

Class 4: Fire sergeant, police sergeant, detective sergeant
16,700
17,532
18,370
19,207
20,045
20,877

Class 5: Fire lieutenant, police lieutenant
19,303
20,273
21,237
22,202
23,166

Class 6: Marine engineer, pilot
21,089
22,138
23,193
24,242

Class 7: Fire captain, police captain
22,870
24,014
25,159
26,299

Class 8: Battalion fire chief, police inspector
26,511
27,836
29,166
30,496

Class 9: Deputy Fire Chief, Deputy Chief of Police
31,111
33,215
35,325
37,434

Class 10: Assistant Chief of Police, Assistant Fire Chief
36,888
39,347
41,806

Class 11: Repealed

(a-1)

The Chief of Police, effective January 2, 2007, and the Fire Chief, effective April 16, 2007, shall be paid in accordance with the DX Schedule for subordinate agency heads pursuant to § 1-610.52.

(b)

Compensation may not be paid, by reason of any provision of this subchapter, at a rate in excess of the rate of basic pay for level V of the Executive Schedule contained in subchapter II of Chapter 53 of Title 5, United States Code.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the annual rates of basic compensation of officers appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall be established by the salary schedule established in subsection (a) of this section as modified pursuant to § 5-545.06a.

History

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 481, Pub. L. 85-584, title I, § 101
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1239, Pub. L. 87-882, § 1
Aug. 14, 1964, 78 Stat. 431, Pub. L. 88-426, title III, § 306(i)(6)
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 880, Pub. L. 88-575, title I, § 101
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1591, Pub. L. 89-810, title I, § 101
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 90-320, § 1(a)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 141, Pub. L. 90-320, § 1(b)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 354, Pub. L. 91-297, title I, § 102
Dec. 7, 1970, 84 Stat. 1391, Pub. L. 91-530, § 3
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 92-410, title I, §§ 101, 102
Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1036, Pub. L. 93-407, title I, § 101(a)(1)
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2173, Pub. L. 93-635, § 1
June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-73, § 2(1), 23 DCR 2807
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law § 13-160, § 103(a), 47 DCR 4619
Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-25, § 3, 54 DCR 8014
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-154, § 6(a), 55 DCR 3678

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
Merit system, pay rates and adjustments, see § 1-611.13.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-611.13, § 1-632.03, § 5-543.01, § 5-544.01, § 5-545.01, § 5-545.03, § 5-545.04, § 5-545.05, § 5-545.06, and § 5-545.06a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-406.
1973 Ed., § 4-823.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-160 added subsec. (c), relating to compensation for officers appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72.
D.C. Law 17-25 added subsec. (a-1).
D.C. Law 17-154, in subsec. (a), substituted “subsections (a-1) and (b)” for “subsection (b)” in the lead-in language, and repealed classification “Class 11: Fire Chief, Chief of Police.” in the salary schedule; and added subsec. (a-1).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-61, October 12, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 1983).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-102, January 10, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 4339).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-137, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6802).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-175, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9236).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-231, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 506).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of District of Columbia Sentencing and Criminal Code Revision Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-72, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7401).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of District of Columbia Sentencing and Criminal Code Revision Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-72, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7401).

References in Text

The reference in (b) to “subchapter II of Chapter 53 of Title 5, United States Code” is codified at 5 U.S.C. §§ 5311 to 5318.

Editor's Notes

Adjustment of salary schedule by Mayor: See Act of June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-73, § 4; Act of May 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-76, § 2.

Retroactive compensation: See Act of August 14, 1964, 78 Stat. 431, Pub. L. 88-426, § 502; Act of September 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 800, Pub. L. 88-575, § 106; Act of November 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1591, Pub. L. 89-810, § 104; Act of May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 90-320, § 7; Act of June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 354, Pub. L. 91-297, § 109; Act of August 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 92-410, § 116(a), (b); Act of September 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1036, Pub. L. 93-407, § 104; Act of June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-73, § 3; Act of May 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-76, § 3.

Metropolitan Police Department pay and benefit performance: Pursuant to §§ 2 and 3 of D.C. Law 6-145, the “Metropolitan Police Department Pay and Benefit Conformance Act of 1986,” effective September 13, 1986, the Council approved changes to the compensation system for career and executive service employees not covered by collective bargaining.

Group insurance: See Act of August 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 481, Pub. L. 85-584, § 508(b); Act of August 14, 1964, 78 Stat. 431, Pub. L. 88-426, § 501(d); Act of September 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 800, Pub. L. 88-575, § 107; Act of November 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1591, Pub. L. 89-810, § 105; Act of May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 90-320, § 8; Act of June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 354, Pub. L. 91-297, § 111; Act of August 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 92-410, § 116(c); Act of September 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1036, Pub. L. 93-407, § 104(c); Act of June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-73, § 3(c); Act of May 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-76, § 3.